Utah statutes.
53B-16-201.   Degrees and certificates that may be conferred.
(1)  Utah State University, Snow College, and Salt Lake Community College may
confer certificates of completion and degrees as determined by the State Board
of Regents.
(2)  The board shall develop evaluative criteria as a means of carefully
monitoring the impact of degree programs on the vocational mission of the
colleges.
